fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-astotin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - astotin - ok : # -m inanimate noun, hat, cap AEW NI1
     astotin+N+I+Sg: astotin
     astotin+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nitastotin
     astotin+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kitastotin
     astotin+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: nitastotininân
     astotin+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg: kitastotininaw
     astotin+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kitastotiniwâw
     astotin+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: otastotin
     astotin+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg: otastotiniwâw
     astotin+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: otastotiniyiw

     astotin+N+I+Pl: astotina
     astotin+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nitastotina
     astotin+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kitastotina
     astotin+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nitastotininâna
     astotin+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl: kitastotininawa
     astotin+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kitastotiniwâwa
     astotin+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: otastotina
     astotin+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl: otastotiniwâwa
     astotin+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: otastotiniyiwa

     astotin+N+I+Loc: astotinihk
     astotin+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: nitastotinihk
     astotin+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc: kitastotinihk
     astotin+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc: nitastotininâhk
     astotin+N+I+Px21Pl+Loc: kitastotininâhk
     astotin+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc: kitastotiniwâhk
     astotin+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc: otastotinihk
     astotin+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc: otastotiniwâhk
     astotin+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: otastotiniyihk

     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg:          [ascocinis,         ascocinisis]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nicascocinis,       nicascocinisis]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kicascocinis,       kicascocinisis]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nicascocinisinân,   nicascocinisisinân]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kicascocinisinaw,   kicascocinisisinaw]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kicascocinisiwâw,   kicascocinisisiwâw]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg:    [ocascocinis,        ocascocinisis]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg:    [ocascocinisiwâw,    ocascocinisisiwâw]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: [ocascocinisiyiw,    ocascocinisisiyiw]

     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Pl:          [ascocinisa,       ascocinisisa]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nicascocinisa,     nicascocinisisa]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kicascocinisa,     kicascocinisisa]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nicascocinisinâna, nicascocinisisinâna]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kicascocinisinawa, kicascocinisisinawa]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kicascocinisiwâwa, kicascocinisisiwâwa]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl:    [ocascocinisa,      ocascocinisisa]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl:    [ocascocinisiwâwa,  ocascocinisisiwâwa]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: [ocascocinisiyiwa,  ocascocinisisiyiwa]
